North Carolina, session 2025, SB131.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

TEMPORARILY MODIFY DISTRIBUTION AND USE OF ONE-HALF OF THE NET
PROCEEDS FROM THE FIRST ONE CENT OF LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX
ALLOCATED TO BUNCOMBE COUNTY
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding Section 6 of Chapter 134 of the 1983 Session
Laws, as amended by Chapter 534 of the 1983 Session Laws and S.L. 2016-19, directing that
one-half of the local government sales and use tax revenue be distributed to the School Capital
Fund Commission for Buncombe County (Commission), the Secretary of Revenue shall
distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the net proceeds of the local government sales and use
tax revenue collected by Buncombe County under Article 39 of Chapter 105 of the General
Statutes in accordance with G.S. 105-472 using the ad valorem method of distribution.
Notwithstanding the provision in G.S. 105-472 allowing counties to change the method of
distribution, Buncombe County is not permitted to change the method of distribution for any year
for which the distribution and use provisions of this act apply.
SECTION 1.(b) Notwithstanding the use provisions in Sections 9 through 12 of
Chapter 134 of the 1983 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 534 of the 1983 Session Laws
and S.L. 2016-19, and applicable to the funds distributed to the Commission, Buncombe County
shall use the net proceeds of the local government sales and use tax revenue collected under
Article 39 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes and allocated to Buncombe County under
subsection (a) of this section as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) for school capital outlay purposes, as defined in
G.S. 115C-426(f), or to retire any indebtedness incurred by the County for
these purposes, and for school operating expenses. The Commission shall
serve in an advisory capacity to the Buncombe County Board of County
Commissioners with respect to the use of funds under this subdivision for
school capital outlay purposes by considering the capital needs of both the
Buncombe County School System and the Asheville City School System,
prioritizing those needs, and recommending projects to be funded. However,
*S131-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the use of funds under this subdivision shall not be under the control of the
Commission and shall be determined by the board of commissioners.
(2) Fifty percent (50%) for any public purpose.
SECTION 1.(c) This section applies only to Buncombe County.
SECTION 1.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to net
proceeds distributed to Buncombe County by the Secretary of Revenue under Article 39 of
Chapter 105 of the General Statutes on or after July 1, 2025, and expires on June 30, 2027.

MAKE TECHNICAL CHANGES TO BUNCOMBE SCHOOL CAPITAL FUND
COMMISSION
SECTION 2. Chapter 134 of the 1983 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 534 of
the 1983 Session Laws and S.L. 2016-19, is recodified as Section 3 of this act and reads as
rewritten:
"Section 1. There is hereby created a Commission to be known as the School Capital Fund
Commission for Buncombe County, which Commission shall have and possess all the powers
conferred by this act and such other powers as may be useful or necessary to permit it fully to
carry out the purposes of this act. The Commission is hereby declared to be a corporation with
perpetual succession, the right to adopt and use a corporate seal, to sue and to be sued, and to
hold, manage and control the moneys and properties received by it under the provisions of this
act. It shall have the right to make reasonable rules and regulations for the conduct of its business.
"Sec. 2. The Commission shall consist of five members. Members of the Commission shall
serve two-year terms and shall be appointed as follows: one appointed by the Asheville City
Board of Education, one appointed by the Buncombe County Board of Education, two appointed
by the Buncombe County Board of Commissioners, and one appointed by the other four
appointees. A member appointed by a local governing board or a school board shall serve at the
pleasure of that board. The member appointed by the other appointees shall serve at the pleasure
of the majority of the other appointees. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority
of the member creating the vacancy to fill the unexpired term.
"Sec. 3. A quorum shall be three members of the Commission.
"Sec. 4. The Commission shall organize, adopt bylaws or rules and regulations to govern its
procedure and the conduct of the business and affairs of the Commission and appoint a chairman
and vice-chairman from among its membership who shall serve a one-year term and appoint a
secretary for a one-year term and until their successors are appointed by the Commission. The
finance officer for Buncombe County shall be the finance officer of the Commission. The county
finance officer shall give bond for the faithful performance of his duties as the finance officer of
the Commission in an amount determined by the Commission. The finance officer of the
Commission shall manage the funds of the Commission only as directed by the Commission. The
Commission may select and appoint an attorney of the Commission to serve at the pleasure of
the Commission. The Commission may fix the compensation for the attorney.
"Sec. 5. Regular or stated meetings of the Commission shall be held at such time and place
as may be provided by the Commission in its bylaws or rules and regulations, and special
meetings may be held on the call of the chairman after due notice.
"Sec. 6. One half One-half of any local government sales and use tax revenue distributed to
Buncombe County under G.S. 105-472 shall be paid to the Commission by the Secretary of
Revenue; provided that if distribution of the local government sales and use tax revenue is made
under G.S. 105-472(2), (the ad valorem method), then taxing districts shall receive their funds
under G.S. 105-472(2) as if no funds had been paid to the Commission by the Secretary of
Revenue, and in computing what amount is one-half of the sales and use tax revenue, the
Secretary of Revenue shall not reduce the total by the amount to be distributed to the taxing
districts. This section does not affect the distribution of any local or State sales and use tax
revenue to the municipalities in Buncombe County.
Page 2 Senate Bill 131-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"Sec. 7. Repealed by Section 1 of Session Laws 2016-19, effective June 21, 2016.
"Sec. 8. Any other capital funds appropriated by Buncombe County new estimated to cost
in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) at any one location 10 pursuant to Article
40 and Article 42 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes shall be apportioned among the
Asheville City Board of Education and the Buncombe County Board of Education according to
the membership of each unit using the process set forth in G.S. 115C-430. Buncombe County
shall maintain separate internal accounts for each school board in order to comply with this
section. These funds are not under the control of the School Capital Fund Commission.
"Sec. 9. All funds received by the Commission under Section 6 of this act shall be placed in
a capital reserve fund as provided in Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.
The capital reserve fund shall be known as the Public School Capital Needs Fund.
"Sec. 10. All funds in the Public School Capital Needs Fund shall be used to finance new
public school of any amount, construction, to finance public school improvement and renovation
projects that exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), estimated to cost in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) at any one location, or to retire any indebtedness incurred
by the county after July 1, 1983 for these purposes.
The Commission shall consider the capital needs of both the Buncombe County School
System and the Asheville City School System, prioritize those needs, and recommend projects
to be funded from the Public School Capital Needs Fund to the board of county commissioners
based on the priority of needs determined.
By joint agreement of the Board of County Commissioners and both boards of education,
money may be transferred from the account under this section of one board of education to the
account under this section of the other board of education, provided that the agreement must
require a transfer back of an equal amount of funds at some fixed date in the future, plus a sum
to be determined at that date which represents interest which would have accrued on the funds if
they had remained in the first account.
"Sec. 11. Moneys in the Public School Capital Needs Fund shall be subject to appropriation
by the board of county commissioners. The Commission shall disburse such moneys as a
ministerial duty upon receiving a written request from the board of county commissioners after
the county board of commissioners has adopted an ordinance and after receipt of a written request
from the appropriate board of education indicating it is prepared to enter into a contract, and
G.S. 115C-521 shall continue to apply.
"Sec. 11.1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if the Buncombe County Board
of Commissioners appropriates any federal revenue sharing funds to the Commission for the
purpose of substituting revenue sharing funds for sales tax funds, then it must at the same time
appropriate from the Commission to the county an equal amount of funds received under Section
6 to be used for such purposes as the Board of Commissioners shall deem appropriate and are
otherwise authorized by law, provided that such federal revenue sharing funds shall be divided
pro rata under Section 10 of this act.
"Sec. 12. The reasonable and necessary expenses of the Commission, including the
compensation of its officers and employees and the cost of any bond required by it, shall be paid
by the County of Buncombe. The chairman of the Commission shall, on or about the first day of
each calendar month, certify to the governing body of Buncombe County the expenses of the
Commission incurred during the preceding month, and the governing body of the county shall
forthwith, and within five days thereafter, cause to be paid to the Commission the expenses
required to be paid. All such payments shall be charged to the general fund of the county."

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 131-Second Edition Page 3